ja: おままごと用の食品アイテムが含まれています: 焼き菓子とデザート; 飲み物; 朝食; 缶詰/箱入り食料品; カットできる食べ物; ファーストフード; 野菜と果物; アイスクリームとスイーツ; 肉/シーフード; 含まれない; ピザ/パスタ; スナック; その他
de: Enthaltene Spiellebensmittel: Backwaren & Desserts; Getränke; Frühstücksprodukte; Lebensmittel in Dosen/Schachteln; Schneidbare Lebensmittel; Fast Food; Obst & Gemüse; Eiscreme & Leckereien; Fleisch/Meeresfrüchte; Keine enthalten; Pizza-/Pasta-Gerichte; Snacks; Sonstige
it: Articoli di cibo giocattolo inclusi: Prodotti da forno e dessert; Bevande; Alimenti per la colazione; Alimenti in scatola/barattolo; Cibo tagliabile; Fast food; Frutta e verdura; Gelati e dolcetti; Carne/pesce; Nessuno incluso; Pasti a base di pizza/pasta; Snack; Altro
hr-HR: Uključene su stavke hrane za igru: Peciva i deserti; Pića; Hrana za doručak; Namirnice u limenci/kutiji; Hrana koja se može rezati; Brza hrana; Voće i povrće; Sladoled i poslastice; Meso/morski plodovi; Nije uključeno; Obroci od pizze i tjestenine; Grickalice; Ostalo
cs: Obsažené položky hraček ve tvaru potravin: Pečivo a dezerty; Nápoje; Snídaňové potraviny; Potraviny v konzervách / krabicích; Krájecí potraviny; Rychlé občerstvení; Ovoce a zelenina; Zmrzlina a sladkosti; Maso / mořské plody; Nic není zahrnuto; Pizza/těstoviny; Svačinky; Jiné
en: Play food items included: Baked goods & desserts; Beverages; Breakfast foods; Canned/boxed groceries; Cuttable food; Fast food; Fruits & vegetables; Ice cream & treats; Meat/seafood; None included; Pizza/pasta meals; Snacks; Other
fi: Leikkiruokatuotteen mukana tulevat osat: Leivonnaiset ja jälkiruoat; Juomat; Aamiaisruoat; Tölkki-/laatikkotuotteet; Leikattava ruoka; Pikaruoka; Hedelmät ja vihannekset; Jäätelö ja herkut; Liha/merenelävät; Ei sisälly; Pizza-/pasta-ateriat; Välipalat; Muu
ru: Игрушечная еда в комплекте: Выпечка и десерты; Напитки; Продукты для завтрака; Консервы/продукты в коробках; Продукты, которые можно разрезать; Фастфуд; Фрукты и овощи; Мороженое и сладости; Мясо/морепродукты; Не входят в комплект; Пицца/паста; Снеки; Другое
hu: Mellékelt játékélelmiszerek: Pékáruk és desszertek; Italok; Reggelifélék; Konzerves/dobozos élelmiszerek; Vágható ételek; Gyorsételek; Gyümölcsök és zöldségek; Jégkrémek és édességek; Húsok/tenger gyümölcsei; Nincs mellékelve; Pizza/tésztaételek; Rágcsálnivalók; Egyéb
vi: Mặt hàng đồ chơi thức ăn bao gồm: Bánh nướng & đồ tráng miệng; Đồ uống; Đồ ăn sáng; Tạp hóa đóng hộp/đóng thùng; Thực phẩm có thể cắt; Thức ăn nhanh; Trái cây & rau củ; Kem & đồ ngọt; Thịt/hải sản; Không kèm theo; Bữa ăn Pizza/mì Ý; Đồ ăn vặt; Khác
bg-BG: Включени хранителни играчки: Печива и десерти; Напитки; Храни за закуска; Консервирани/опаковани хранителни стоки; Храна за рязане; Бърза храна; Плодове и зеленчуци; Сладолед и лакомства; Месо/морски дарове; Няма включени; Ястия с пица/паста; Снакс; Друго
th: รวมรายการอาหารเล่น: ขนมอบและของหวาน; เครื่องดื่ม; อาหารเช้า; อาหารกระป๋อง/กล่อง; อาหารที่หั่นได้; อาหารฟาสต์ฟู้ด; ผักและผลไม้; ไอศกรีมและของกินเล่น; เนื้อสัตว์/อาหารทะเล; ไม่ได้รวม; พิซซ่า/พาสต้า; ขนมขบเคี้ยว; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Articole incluse de alimente de jucărie: Produse de patiserie și deserturi; Băuturi; Alimente pentru micul dejun; Alimente la conservă/cutie; Alimente feliabile; Fast food; Fructe și legume; Înghețată și dulciuri; Carne/fructe de mare; Nu este inclus; Mese cu pizza/paste; Gustări; Altele
pt-BR: Comidinha de brinquedo itens incluídos: Assados e sobremesas; Bebidas; Alimentos de café da manhã; Alimentos enlatados/em caixa; Alimento cortável; Fast food; Frutas e vegetais; Sorvetes e doces; Carnes/frutos do mar; Nenhum incluído; Refeições de pizza/massa; Lanches; Outro
fr: Aliments factices inclus: Pâtisseries et desserts; Boissons; Aliments pour le petit-déjeuner; Produits d’épicerie en boîte/conserve; Aliments à découper; Restauration rapide; Fruits et légumes; Crème glacée et friandises; Viande/fruits de mer; Aucun inclus; Repas de pizza/pâtes; Collations; Autre
da: Medfølgende elementer af legemad: Bagværk og desserter; Drikkevarer; Morgenmadsprodukter; Konserves-/pakkede dagligvarer; Mad, der kan skæres ud; Fastfood; Frugt og grønt; Is og lækkerier; Kød/fisk og skaldyr; Ingen inkluderet; Pizza-/pastamåltider; Snacks; Andet
es: Artículos de comida de juguete incluidos: Productos horneados y postres; Bebidas; Alimentos de desayuno; Comestibles enlatados/en caja; Comida cortable; Comida rápida; Frutas y verduras; Helado y golosinas; Carne/mariscos; Ninguno incluido; Comidas de pizza/pasta; Bocadillos; Otro
lt-LT: Įtraukti žaislinio maisto elementai: Kepiniai ir desertai; Gėrimai; Pusryčių maistas; Konservuoti / supakuoti maisto produktai; Pjaustomas maistas; Greitasis maistas; Vaisiai ir daržovės; Ledai ir skanėstai; Mėsa / jūros gėrybės; Nepridedama; Pica / makaronų patiekalai; Užkandžiai; Kita
ko: 장난감 음식 포함 품목: 구운 식품 및 디저트; 음료; 아침 식사 식품; 통조림/상자 식료품; 자르기 가능한 식품; 패스트푸드; 과일 및 채소; 아이스크림 및 간식; 육류/해산물; 포함되지 않음; 피자/파스타 식사; 스낵; 기타
pl: Dołączone elementy zabawkowego jedzenia: Wypieki i desery; Napoje; Produkty śniadaniowe; Artykuły spożywcze w puszkach i pudełkach; Żywność do krojenia; Fast food; Owoce i warzywa; Lody i smakołyki; Mięso / owoce morza; Brak w zestawie; Pizza / makaron; Przekąski; Inne
zh-CN: 仿真食物所含种类: 烘焙食品和甜点; 饮料; 早餐食品; 罐装/盒装食品; 可切割食品; 快餐; 水果和蔬菜; 冰淇淋和零食; 肉类/海鲜; 未包含任何食品; 披萨/意面; 零食; 其他
sl-SI: Vključeni kosi igrač v obliki hrane: Pekovski izdelki in sladice; Pijače; Hrana za zajtrk; Konzervirana/zapakirana živila; Hrana za rezanje; Hitra hrana; Sadje in zelenjava; Sladoled in posladki; Meso/morska hrana; Ni priloženo; Pica/testenine; Prigrizki; Drugo
zh-TW: 隨附玩具食物品項: 烘焙食品與甜點; 飲料; 早餐食品; 罐裝/盒裝食品; 可切開的食物; 速食; 水果與蔬菜; 冰淇淋與零食; 肉類/海鮮; 不含任何項目; 披薩/義大利麵餐點; 零食; 其他
tr: Dahil olan oyun yiyecek ürünleri: Unlu mamuller ve tatlılar; İçecekler; Kahvaltılıklar; Konserve/kutu gıdalar; Kesilebilir yiyecekler; Fast food; Meyveler ve sebzeler; Dondurma ve ikramlıklar; Et/deniz ürünleri; Dahil değil; Pizza/makarna yemekleri; Atıştırmalıklar; Diğer
el: Περιλαμβάνονται τρόφιμα-παιχνίδια: Αρτοσκευάσματα και επιδόρπια; Ροφήματα; Είδη πρωινού; Τρόφιμα σε κονσέρβα/κουτί; Τρόφιμα για κόψιμο; Fast food; Φρούτα και λαχανικά; Παγωτό και λιχουδιές; Κρέας/θαλασσινά; Δεν περιλαμβάνεται κανένα; Γεύματα με πίτσα/ζυμαρικά; Σνακ; Άλλο
nb: Lekematgjenstander inkludert: Bakevarer og desserter; Drikkevarer; Frokostmat; Hermetikk/tørrvarer; Mat som kan skjæres; Hurtigmat; Frukt og grønt; Iskrem og godteri; Kjøtt/sjømat; Ingen inkludert; Pizza-/pastamåltider; Snacks; Annet
sv: Matleksaker som ingår: Bakverk och desserter; Drycker; Frukostmat; Konserver/förpackade livsmedel; Delbar mat; Snabbmat; Frukt och grönsaker; Glass och godsaker; Kött/skaldjur; Inga inkluderade; Pizza-/pastarätter; Snacks; Övrigt
sk-SK: Obsiahnuté položky hračkárskych potravín: Pečivo a dezerty; Nápoje; Raňajkové jedlá; Konzervované/balené potraviny; Krájacie jedlo; Rýchle občerstvenie; Ovocie a zelenina; Zmrzlina a sladkosti; Mäso/morské plody; Nie sú súčasťou; Pizza/cestoviny; Pochutiny; Iné
pt-PT: Artigo de comida de brinquedo incluído: Pastelaria e sobremesas; Bebidas; Alimentos de pequeno-almoço; Mercearias em lata/caixa; Alimentos para cortar; Fast food; Frutas e vegetais; Gelados e guloseimas; Carne/marisco; Nenhum incluído; Refeições de pizza/massa; Snacks; Outro
nl: Speelgoedeten meegeleverde items: Gebak & desserts; Dranken; Ontbijtproducten; Boodschappen in blik/doos; Snijdbaar eten; Fastfood; Fruit & groenten; IJs & lekkernijen; Vlees/zeevruchten; Geen inbegrepen; Pizza-/pastamaaltijden; Snacks; Overig